Colorado, session 2026A, HB1182.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal 12-280-106.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-280-127, amend
(5)(c)(I) as follows:
12-280-127. Disciplinary actions.
(5) (c) (I) The board, after providing notice and an opportunity to be
heard, may fine a registrant who THAT distributes a veterinary drug in
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

violation of this article 280 not less than fifty dollars nor more than five
hundred dollars for each violation, with a maximum aggregated fine of five
thousand dollars for multiple violations; except that, if after considering the
recommendations of the advisory committee created in section 12-280-106,
the board determines that the registrant has committed one or more
egregious violations, the board may fine the registrant in accordance with
subsection (5)(a) of this section.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1203, repeal
(17)(a)(III) as follows:
2-3-1203. Sunset review of advisory committees - legislative
declaration - definition - repeal.
(17) (a) The following statutory authorizations for the designated
advisory committees will repeal on September 1, 2026:
(III) The veterinary pharmaceutical advisory committee, created in
section 12-280-106;
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1182

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1182